Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF146.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2352YH (3) 91 je/jh H.F. 146 Section 1. MEDICAL SCHOOL PROGRAM DURATION ââ STUDY. The 1 university of Iowa college of medicine and Des Moines 2 university ââ osteopathic medical center shall jointly conduct 3 a study of the feasibility of transitioning their respective 4 medical schools from four-year programs to three-year programs. 5 The study shall include an analysis of other medical schools 6 that have implemented such a transition and the results of 7 such transitions, including the reduced costs for students 8 enrolled in such programs. The university of Iowa college 9 of medicine and Des Moines university ââ osteopathic medical 10 center shall jointly submit a report, including their findings 11 and recommendations, to the governor and the general assembly 12 by December 1, 2025. 13